Washington statutes.
RCW 41.56.050

Disagreement in selection of bargaining representative—Disagreement as to merger of bargaining units—Intervention by commission.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5503-S.SL) ***

(1) In the event that a public employer and public employees are in disagreement as to the selection of a bargaining representative, the commission shall be invited to intervene as is provided in RCW 41.56.060 through 41.56.090.

(2) In the event that a public employer and a bargaining representative are in disagreement as to the merger of two or more bargaining units in the employer's workforce that are represented by the same bargaining representative, the commission shall be invited to intervene as is provided in RCW 41.56.060 through 41.56.090.

[ 2011 c 222 s 1; 1975 1st ex.s. c 296 s 16; 1967 ex.s. c 108 s 5.]